tests/runtime/attachinsert.sbl
// Test `attach` and `insert`.

externals (stem)

define stem as (
  ='abcd'
  do (
    hop 2
    attach '-'
    $(cursor == 2) or fail='forwards attach changed cursor'
    next
  )
  $(cursor == 0) or fail='do failed to restore cursor after forwards attach'
  test ('ab-cd' atlimit) or fail='attach failed to update correctly'

  ='abcd'
  do (
    hop 2
    insert '-'
    $(cursor == 3) or fail='forwards insert failed to move cursor'
    next
  )
  $(cursor == 0) or fail='do failed to restore cursor after forwards insert'
  test ('ab-cd' atlimit) or fail='insert failed to update correctly'

  ='abcd'
  backwards (
    do (
      hop 2
      attach '-'
      $(cursor == 3) or fail='backwards attach failed to move cursor'
      next
    )
    $(cursor == size) or fail='do failed to restore cursor after backwards attach'
   )
  test ('ab-cd' atlimit) or fail='attach failed to update correctly'

  ='abcd'
  backwards (
    do (
      hop 2
      insert '-'
      $(cursor == 2) or fail='backwards insert moved cursor'
      next
    )
    $(cursor == size) or fail='do failed to restore cursor after backwards insert'
  )
  test ('ab-cd' atlimit) or fail='insert failed to update correctly'

  ='ok'
)
